District of Columbia statutes.
29-313.04

Court-ordered inspection.

(a)

If a corporation does not allow a shareholder that complies with § 29-313.02(a) to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the Superior Court may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation’s expense upon application of the shareholder.

(b)

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a shareholder to inspect and copy any other record, the shareholder that complies with § 29-313.02(b) and (c) may apply to the Superior Court for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

(c)

If the Superior Court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s expenses incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder to inspect the records demanded.

(d)

If the Superior Court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding shareholder.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720